Colorado, session 2026A, HB1016.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-134, amend (3)
introductory portion and (3)(c) as follows:
23-1-134. Commission directive - open educational resources -
course notice - report - definitions.
(3) Notwithstanding the requirement in section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I),
on or before October 1, 2021, and on or before December 1 each year
thereafter through December 1, 2026 ANNUALLY THEREAFTER UNTIL
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

DECEMBER 31, 2031, the department shall prepare and shall submit to the
commission, the council, the joint budget committee, and the education
committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor
committees, a report concerning implementation and development of open
educational resources around the state. The department shall work with the
council in preparing the report, and the public institutions of higher
education shall collaborate with the department and council in providing the
information necessary for the report. At a minimum, the report must
include:
(c) The number and percentage of the courses offered by the public
institutions of higher education that use open educational resources as the
primary resources for the course ARE ZERO TEXTBOOK COST FOR STUDENTS;
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-4.5-103, amend
(1)(a) introductory portion, (1)(a)(II), (1)(a)(IV), (1)(a)(V), and (1)(a)(VI)
as follows:
23-4.5-103. Colorado open educational resources council -
created - duties - report.
(1) There is created in the department of higher education the
Colorado open educational resources council, which is composed of the
following members:
(a) Twelve FIFTEEN persons from public institutions of higher
education appointed by the executive director as follows:
(II) Three FOUR library professionals;
(IV) One TWO instructional design expert EXPERTS;
(V) One informational technology expert ACADEMIC TECHNOLOGIST;
and
(VI) One administrator TWO ADMINISTRATORS;
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 23-4.5-106 as
follows:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1016

23-4.5-106. Repeal of article.
This article 4.5 is repealed, effective November 1, 2026 NOVEMBER
1, 2031.
SECTION 4. Appropriation. For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$275,000 is appropriated to the department of higher education for use by
the Colorado commission on higher education and higher education special
purpose programs. This appropriation is from the general fund and is based
on an assumption that the department will require an additional 1.0 FTE. To
implement this act, the department may use this appropriation for open
educational resources initiatives.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1016

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1016